Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1071
Temporary, nonrenewable event license; body art event; authorized practice; requirements; fee; inspection; violation.

(1) The department shall create and issue a temporary, nonrenewable event license for an individual who is attending a body art event which shall allow the individual to practice for no more than seven consecutive days in any twelve-month period. No more than two temporary event licenses shall be issued to the same individual in any twelve-month period. An individual holding an event license under this section shall practice within a licensed body art facility that has been inspected pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

(2) An individual applying for an event license described in subsection (1) of this section shall hold a valid, unrestricted license or permit showing the individual is active in another state and shall submit the following documents to the department:

(a) A completed application form;

(b) A copy of a government-issued photographic identification showing the individual's proof of age;

(c) A copy of the individual's body art license; and

(d) A sponsorship letter from the owner or operator of a licensed body art facility at which the individual will practice under the event license.

(3) The event license shall include the (a) individual's name, (b) approved location or event, (c) expiration date, (d) state of issuance, and (e) number of the individual's license or permit.

(4) The department shall charge a fifty-dollar fee for issuance of the event license. The department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund.

(5) The department may conduct an in-person inspection of the body art facility where body art practice will occur for a body art event to assess compliance with the department's rules and regulations. Such inspection may be conducted by a health specialist with body art training, including, but not limited to, a registered environmental health specialist.

(6) A violation of this section is subject to the same penalties as an individual or a facility holding a permanent license to practice body art under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2026, LB720, § 2.
March 13, 2026